src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-ponty_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - понты: # Verb ''
# Subject
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg: понлдум
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg: понлдан
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg: поналд
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du: понлдамн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du: понлдатн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du: понлданган
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl: понлдув
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl: понлдаты
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl: понлдат
# !Singular Object
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcSg3: понэм
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcSg3: понэн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcSg3: понэлд
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcSg3: понэмн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcSg3: поналдн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+Oc3: поналдн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+Oc3: понлдув
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+Oc3: поналдн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+Oc3: понэлд
# !Dual and Plural Object
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcPl3: поналдам
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcPl3: поналдан
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcPl3: поналд
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcPl3: поналдамн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcPl3: поналдн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcPl3: поналдн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcPl3: поналдув
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcPl3: поналдн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcPl3: поналдалд
# Passive
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc1Sg: понаюм
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc2Sg: понайн
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc3Sg: пона
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc1Du: понайман
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc2Du: понайтан
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc3Du: понайнган
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc1Pl: понаюв
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc2Pl: понайты
     понты+V+Ind+Prs+Pc3Pl: понаят
